Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.762

Recovery residences—Revolving fund. (Expires July 1, 2025.)

(1) The authority shall establish a revolving fund for loans to operators of new recovery residences or existing recovery residences actively seeking certification and registration under RCW 41.05.760. Approved uses of the funds include, but are not limited to:

(a) Facility modifications necessary to achieve certification; and

(b) Operating start-up costs, including rent or mortgage payments, security deposits, salaries for on-site staff, and minimal maintenance costs.

(2) This section expires July 1, 2025.

[ 2019 c 264 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—2019 c 264: See note following RCW 41.05.760.